Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 1. Capitol and State Building Commission
§ 9-5-111.
State capitol building rehabilitation and restoration project oversight group; creation; duties. [Repealed]

History.

2014 ch. 40, § 1, effective March 6, 2014; 2016 ch. 105, § 3, effective July 1, 2016; 2017 ch. 204, § 1, effective March 13, 2017; Laws 2019, ch. 197, § 2.

§ 9-5-112.
Capitol building rehabilitation and restoration project; components; oversight.

The department shall proceed with level III design and construction for renovation, rehabilitation, restoration and addition to the state capitol building, the Herschler state office building and the connection between the two (2) buildings in accordance with presentations to the management council of the legislature on November 18, 2013 and January 9, 2014, and the provisions of W.S.

9-5-109

through

9-5-113

. The project shall proceed as a single funded project with the following components:

Capitol building restoration and rehabilitation;

Herschler state office building renovation, rehabilitation and additional construction including a structure connecting the Herschler building and the capitol building and addition to the Herschler building;

Temporary space accommodations within the Herschler building and in other state owned buildings, or in other leased buildings if determined by the governor necessary or advisable for the project, for current occupants of the Herschler building and capitol building;

Restoration, rehabilitation and renovation of the Herschler building after temporary space accommodations are no longer needed;

Furniture, fixtures and equipment for the project;

Contingency costs, costs of fees and other costs associated with the project.

Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 197, § 2.

The Herschler state office building rehabilitation, renovation and addition shall be designed to accommodate offices for elected state officials for which insufficient space is provided within the capitol building restoration, renovation and rehabilitation design.

and (e) Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 197, § 2.

The department may expend funds appropriated by the legislature for the project to implement the design, renovation, restoration, rehabilitation, construction and other project components which have been included in the final design plans approved under subsection (e) of this section. Any change order to the approved final design plans in excess of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00) or in a cumulative amount in excess of one million dollars ($1,000,000.00) shall require the approval of the governor and a majority of the other voting members of the oversight group which consist of the legislator members and the state treasurer.

History.

2014 ch. 40, § 1, effective March 6, 2014; 2017 ch. 204, § 1, effective March 13, 2017; 2019 ch. 197, § 2, effective March 15, 2019.

The 2019 amendment

repealed (b), (d), and (e), which pertained to space allocation, alternatives to temporary locations of officials and legislative functions during project construction, and the expenditure of funds for construction.

The repeal of W.S. 9-5-112(b) under Section 2 of this act is effective January 1, 2020.

Laws 2019, ch. 197 § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Became law without signature March 15, 2019.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2014, ch. 40, § 10, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 6, 2014.

Constitutionality. —

Given that the capitol restoration statutes ( W.S.

9-5-110

through

9-5-113

) directly address “repairing” and “furnishing” the “halls” and “rooms” used for the meeting of the legislature as those words were defined at the time the Wyoming Constitution was ratified, any contracts for those repairs and furnishings are subject to the approval of the state treasurer pursuant to
Wyo. Const. art. 3, § 31. Contrary to that provision, however, the capitol restoration statutes give others the responsibility for effectuating the project, including repairing and furnishing the halls and rooms used for meetings of the legislature. Under any good faith and common sense reading of the capitol restoration legislation, the treasurer's responsibility to approve contracts for the restoration of and furnishings for the legislative halls and committee rooms has been entrusted to the state construction department, oversight group, and the governor. The legislation, therefore, violates
Wyo. Const. art. 3, § 31 and is unconstitutional on its face.
Gordon v. State, 2018 WY 32, 413 P.3d 1093,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 2018).

§ 9-5-113.
Capitol building rehabilitation and restoration project; design and construction execution.

Notwithstanding W.S.

9-5-101

through

9-5-108

, for all components of the project:

The state construction department shall be the primary fiscal and contracting agent;

Level III design and construction shall proceed under the immediate direction and control of the governor in accordance with the provisions of W.S.

9-5-110

through

9-5-113

;

Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 197, § 2.

History.

2014 ch. 40, § 1, effective March 6, 2014; 2016 ch. 105, § 3, effective July 1, 2016; 2019 ch. 197, § 2, effective March 15, 2019.

Effective Dates

Laws 2019, ch. 197 § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Became law without signature March 15, 2019.

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, in (a)(i), substituted “state construction department” for “construction management program within the general services division of the department.”

Effective date. —

Laws 2014, ch. 40, § 10, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 6, 2014.

State treasurer approval. —

Given that the capitol restoration statutes ( W.S.

9-5-110

through

9-5-113

) directly address “repairing” and “furnishing” the “halls” and “rooms” used for the meeting of the legislature as those words were defined at the time the Wyoming Constitution was ratified, any contracts for those repairs and furnishings are subject to the approval of the state treasurer pursuant to
Wyo. Const. art. 3, § 31. Contrary to that provision, however, the capitol restoration statutes give others the responsibility for effectuating the project, including repairing and furnishing the halls and rooms used for meetings of the legislature. Under any good faith and common sense reading of the capitol restoration legislation, the treasurer's responsibility to approve contracts for the restoration of and furnishings for the legislative halls and committee rooms has been entrusted to the state construction department, oversight group, and the governor. The legislation, therefore, violates
Wyo. Const. art. 3, § 31 and is unconstitutional on its face.
Gordon v. State, 2018 WY 32, 413 P.3d 1093,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 2018).

Wyo. Const. art. 2, § 1 prohibits any person or collection of persons charged with exercising the powers belonging to one of the three branches of government from exercising powers properly belonging to another branch, except as the Constitution expressly directs or permits.
Wyo. Const. art. 3, § 31 expressly requires the state treasurer's approval of contracts for repairing and furnishing areas used by the legislature. Wyoming's capitol restoration legislation assigns all aspects of the project to the governor and other officials and groups created by the legislature. It, therefore, usurps the treasurer's authority under
Wyo. Const. art. 3, § 31 and violates the separation of powers provision of the Wyoming Constitution.
Gordon v. State, 2018 WY 32, 413 P.3d 1093,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 2018).